Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4644.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 657a. (1) A village or city having a population of fewer than 65,000 individuals based on the most recent federal decennial census may by resolution allow the operation of golf carts on the streets of that village or city, subject to the requirements of this section. A township having a population of fewer than 65,000 individuals based on the most recent federal decennial census may by resolution, unless disapproved by the county board of commissioners under subsection (3), allow the operation of golf carts on the streets of that township, subject to the requirements of this section. (2) If a village, city, or township allows the operation of golf carts on the streets of that village, city, or township, that village, city, or township may require those golf carts and the operators of those golf carts to be recorded on a list maintained by that village, city, or township. A village, city, or township shall not charge a fee for listing golf carts or the operators of those golf carts. (3) A county board of commissioners may, by resolution, disapprove the operation of golf carts on the streets of a township located within that county if the county board of commissioners conducts a hearing and determines that 1 or more of the following apply: (a) The operation of golf carts on the streets of that township would cause significant environmental damage. (b) The operation of golf carts on the streets of that township would cause a significant concern of public safety. (4) The county board of commissioners shall provide public notice of a hearing under subsection (3) at least 45 days before the hearing is conducted. The county board of commissioners shall also provide written notice of a hearing under subsection (3) to the township at least 45 days before the hearing is conducted. (5) An individual shall not operate a golf cart on any street unless the individual is at least 16 years old and is licensed to operate a motor vehicle. (6) The operator of a golf cart shall comply with the signal requirements of section 648 that apply to the operation of a vehicle. (7) An individual operating a golf cart on a roadway shall ride as near to the right side of the roadway as practicable, exercising due care when passing a standing vehicle or a vehicle proceeding in the same direction. (8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9), an individual shall not operate a golf cart on a state trunk line highway. This subsection does not prohibit an individual from crossing a state trunk line highway when operating a golf cart on a street of a village, city, or township, using the most direct line of crossing. (9) The legislative body of a local unit of government having a population of not more than 30,000 based on the most recent federal decennial census may request the state transportation department to authorize the local unit of government to adopt an ordinance authorizing the operation of golf carts on a state trunk line highway, other than an interstate highway or a freeway, located within the local unit of government. The request must describe how the authorization would meet the requirements of subsection (10). The state transportation department shall solicit comment on the request from the local units of government where the state trunk line highway is located. The state transportation department shall consider comments received on the request before making a decision on the request. The state transportation department shall grant the request in whole or in part or deny the request not more than 60 days after the request is received. If the state transportation department grants a request in whole or in part under this subsection, the local unit of government that submitted the request may adopt an ordinance authorizing the operation of golf carts on the state trunk line highway that was the subject of the request. A county may submit a request for authorization under this subsection on behalf of 1 or more local units of government located within that county if requested by those local units of government. (10) The state transportation department shall authorize the operation of a golf cart under subsection (9) only on a state trunk line highway that is not an interstate highway or a freeway within a local unit of government having a population of not more than 30,000 based on the most recent federal decennial census that has already adopted an ordinance under subsection (1), that serves as a connector between portions of the local unit of government that only connect through the state trunk line highway, and that meets 1 or more of the following requirements: (a) Provides access to tourist attractions, food service establishments, fuel, motels, or other services. (b) Serves as a connector between 2 segments of the same county road that run along discontinuous town lines. (c) Includes a bridge or culvert that allows a golf cart to cross a river, stream, wetland, or gully that is not crossed by a street or county road on which golf carts are authorized to operate under an ordinance adopted as provided in subsection (1). (11) The state transportation department may permanently or temporarily close a state trunk line highway to the operation of golf carts otherwise authorized under subsection (9) after written notice to the clerk of the local unit of government that requested the authorization under subsection (9). The notice must be in writing and sent by first-class United States mail or personally delivered not less than 30 days before the adoption of the rule or order closing the state trunk line highway. The notice must set forth specific reasons for the closure. The state transportation department is not required to develop a plan for an alternate route for a state trunk line highway that it has temporarily closed to the operation of golf carts. (12) Where a usable and designated path for golf carts is provided adjacent to a highway or street, an individual operating a golf cart may, by local ordinance, be required to use that path. (13) An individual operating a golf cart shall not pass between lines of traffic, but may pass on the left of traffic moving in the individualâs direction in the case of a 2-way street or on the left or right of traffic in the case of a 1-way street, in an unoccupied lane. (14) A golf cart must not be operated on a sidewalk constructed for the use of pedestrians. (15) A golf cart must be operated at a speed not to exceed 15 miles per hour and must not be operated on a state trunk line highway or a highway or street with a speed limit of more than 30 miles per hour except to cross that state trunk line highway or highway or street. A village, city, or township may, by resolution, designate roads or classifications of roads for use by golf carts under this subsection. (16) A golf cart must not be operated on a state trunk line highway or the streets of a city, village, or township during the time period from 1/2 hour before sunset to 1/2 hour after sunrise. (17) An individual operating a golf cart or who is a passenger in a golf cart is not required to wear a crash helmet. (18) An individual operating a golf cart on a state trunk line highway shall ride as near to the right side of the roadway as practicable. (19) This section does not apply to a police officer in the performance of the police officerâs official duties. (20) A golf cart operated on a street of a village, city, or township under this section is not required to be registered under this act for purposes of section 3101 of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3101. (21) As used in this section, âgolf cartâ means a vehicle designed for transportation while playing the game of golf. A village, city, or township may require a golf cart registered within its jurisdiction to meet any or all of the following vehicle safety requirements of a low-speed vehicle for approval under this section: (a) At least 2 headlamps that comply with section 685. (b) At least 1 tail lamp that complies with section 686. (c) At least 1 stop lamp and 1 lamp or mechanical signal device that comply with sections 697 and 697b. (d) At least 1 red reflector on each side of the golf cart as far to the rear as practicable and 1 red reflector on the rear of the golf cart as required for low-speed vehicles by 49 CFR 571.500. (e) One exterior mirror mounted on the driverâs side of the golf cart and either 1 exterior mirror mounted on the passenger side of the golf cart or 1 interior mirror as required for low-speed vehicles by 49 CFR 571.500. (f) Brakes and a parking brake that comply with section 705. (g) A horn that complies with section 706. (h) A windshield that complies with section 708a. (i) A manufacturerâs identification number permanently affixed to the frame of the golf cart. (j) Safety belts that comply with section 710a and that are used as required by section 710e. (k) The crash helmet requirements applicable to low-speed vehicles under section 658b. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor